utilities/dictionaries/cs_CS-Czech.aff
SFX A Y 761
SFX A   íst         tu         číst
SFX A   íst         teš        číst
SFX A   íst         te         číst
SFX A   íst         teme       číst
SFX A   íst         tete       číst
SFX A   íst         tou        číst
SFX A   íst         ti         číst
SFX A   íst         těme       číst
SFX A   íst         těte       číst
SFX A   íst         etl        číst
SFX A   íst         etla       číst
SFX A   íst         etlo       číst
SFX A   íst         etli       číst
SFX A   íst         etly       číst
SFX A   íst         ětu        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ěteš       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ěte        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ěteme      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětete      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětou       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ěť         [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ěťme       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ěťte       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětl        [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětla       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětlo       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětli       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětly       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edu        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edeš       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ede        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edeme      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edete      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edou       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eď         [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eďme       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         eďte       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edl        [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edla       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edlo       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edli       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edly       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   ést         esu        nést
SFX A   ést         eseš       nést
SFX A   ést         ese        nést
SFX A   ést         eseme      nést
SFX A   ést         esete      nést
SFX A   ést         esou       nést
SFX A   ést         es         nést
SFX A   ést         esme       nést
SFX A   ést         este       nést
SFX A   ést         esl        nést
SFX A   ést         esla       nést
SFX A   ést         eslo       nést
SFX A   ést         esli       nést
SFX A   ést         esly       nést
SFX A   ést         etu        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eteš       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         ete        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eteme      [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etete      [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etou       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eť         [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eťme       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         eťte       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etl        [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etla       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etlo       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etli       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etly       [^n]ést
SFX A   ást         adu        ást
SFX A   ást         adeš       ást
SFX A   ást         ade        ást
SFX A   ást         ademe      ást
SFX A   ást         adete      ást
SFX A   ást         adou       ást
SFX A   ást         aď         ást
SFX A   ást         aďme       ást
SFX A   ást         aďte       ást
SFX A   ást         adl        ást
SFX A   ást         adla       ást
SFX A   ást         adlo       ást
SFX A   ást         adli       ást
SFX A   ást         adly       ást
SFX A   ézt         ezu        ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezeš       ézt
SFX A   ézt         eze        ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezeme      ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezete      ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezou       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ez         ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezme       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezte       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezl        ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezla       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezlo       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezli       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezly       ézt
SFX A   rát         eru        rát
SFX A   rát         ereš       rát
SFX A   rát         ere        rát
SFX A   rát         ereme      rát
SFX A   rát         erete      rát
SFX A   rát         erou       rát
SFX A   rát         er         rát
SFX A   rát         erme       rát
SFX A   rát         erte       rát
SFX A   lát         elu        lát
SFX A   lát         eleš       lát
SFX A   lát         ele        lát
SFX A   lát         eleme      lát
SFX A   lát         elete      lát
SFX A   lát         elou       lát
SFX A   lát         el         lát
SFX A   lát         elme       lát
SFX A   lát         elte       lát
SFX A   át          u          [^lr]át
SFX A   át          eš         [^lr]át
SFX A   át          e          [^lr]át
SFX A   át          eme        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ete        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ou         [^lr]át
SFX A   át          i          [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ěme        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          ěte        [^lr]át
SFX A   át          al         át
SFX A   át          ala        át
SFX A   át          alo        át
SFX A   át          ali        át
SFX A   át          aly        át
SFX A   éct         eču        éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eku        éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ečeš       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eče        éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ečeme      éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ečete      éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ečou       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekou       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eč         éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ec         éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ečme       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ecme       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ečte       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ecte       éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekl        [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekla       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eklo       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekli       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         ekly       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uču        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uku        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        učeš       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uče        ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        učeme      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        učete      ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        učou       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ukou       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uč         ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        uc         ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        učme       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucme       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        učte       ouc[it]
SFX A   ouct        ucte       ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kl         ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kla        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          klo        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kli        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          kly        ouc[it]
SFX A   ci          hu         oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ůžu        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ůžeš       oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ůže        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ůžeme      oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ůžete      oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hou        oc[it]
SFX A   oci         ůžou       oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hl         oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hla        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hlo        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hli        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hly        oc[it]
SFX A   ovat        uji        ovat
SFX A   ovat        uju        ovat
SFX A   ovat        uješ       ovat
SFX A   ovat        uje        ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujeme      ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujete      ovat
SFX A   ovat        ují        ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujou       ovat
SFX A   ovat        uj         ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujte       ovat
SFX A   ovat        ujme       ovat
SFX A   at          u          [^o]vat
SFX A   at          eš         [^o]vat
SFX A   at          e          [^o]vat
SFX A   at          eme        [^o]vat
SFX A   at          ete        [^o]vat
SFX A   at          ou         [^o]vat
SFX A   at          0          avat
SFX A   at          me         avat
SFX A   at          te         avat
SFX A   at          i          [^aio]vat
SFX A   at          ěme        [^aio]vat
SFX A   at          ěte        [^aio]vat
SFX A   zat         žu         zat
SFX A   zat         žeš        zat
SFX A   zat         že         zat
SFX A   zat         žeme       zat
SFX A   zat         žete       zat
SFX A   zat         žou        zat
SFX A   zat         ž          [^áíu]zat
SFX A   zat         žme        [^áíu]zat
