utilities/dictionaries/cs_CS-Czech.dic
akreditovat/ATN
anulovat/ATN
avalovat/ATN
bivakovat/ATN
bolševizovat/ATN
bručet/ATN
břichatět/AJN
choulit/ATN
chřoupat/AJTN
cyklit/AN
defraudovat/ATN
demilitarizovat/ATN
despiralizovat/ATN
disipovat/ATN
doauditovat/ATN
doburácet/AJN
docvičovat/ATN
dodřímat/AJN
dohemžit/AN
dohryzat/AJTN
doklapat/AJTN
dokormidlovat/ATN
dokurýrovat/ATN
doleštit/ATN
domeandrovat/AN
domáčknout/ATN
doočkovat/ATN
doplátkovat/ATN
dopružit/AN
dorenderovat/ATN
dosedět/ATN
dosolovat/ATN
dostřihovat/ATN
dotestovat/ATN
dotvrzovat/ATN
dovláčet/AJTN
dovážit/ATN
doúpět/AJN
doškatulkovat/ATN
došílet/AJN
drnčet/AN
dírkovat/ATN
emitovat/ATN
exportovat/ATN
figurovat/AN
fotografovat/ATN
gilotinovat/ATN
harašit/AN
hluchnout/AN
hospitalizovat/ATN
hryzat/AJTN
hysterizovat/ATN
imprimovat/ATN
inscenovat/ATN
investovat/ATN
justovat/ATN
kapsovat/ATN
klevetit/ACN
klížit/ATN
komentovat/ATN
konkurovat/AN
koprnět/AJN
kočkovat/AN
kroužit/AN
kupážovat/ATN
kádrovat/ATN
ladit/ATN
lenošit/AN
loknout/ATN
líbit/AN
mastit/ACN
mikroprogramovat/ATN
moralizovat/ATN
mužnět/AJN
nabagrovat/ATN
nachmelit/ATN
nadlehčovat/ATN
nadzdvihovat/ATN
nahazovat/ATN
nainvestovat/ATN
naklást/ATN
nakrvácet/AJN
nalajnovat/ATN
nalétnout/AN
namydlit/ATN
napatinovat/ATN
naporoučet/AJTN
napěnit/ATN
nascanovat/ATN
naspořit/ATN
nasunout/ATN
natrefit/ATN
navlhnout/ATN
navěšet/AJTN
nařasit/ATN
našpulit/ATN
nervóznět/AJTN
násobit/ATN
obhlídnout/ATXN
oblažit/ATN
obměňovat/ATN
obsazovat/ATN
obveselit/ATN
ochladit/ACN
odaretovat/ATN
odchlipovat/ATN
oddělit/ATN
odgermanizovat/ATN
odhupkovat/AN
odklínovat/ATN
odkupovat/ATN
odlišit/ATN
odminovat/ATN
odnacizovat/ATN
odplazit/AN
odpočnout/ATN
odreagovat/ATN
odskákat/ATN
odstěhovat/ATN
odtlouct/ATN
odvděčovat/AN
odvážet/AJTN
odčinit/ATN
odšpendlovat/ATN
ohlušit/ATN
oklasifikovat/ATN
okupovat/ATN
omazat/ATN
oočkovat/ATN
oplotit/ACN
opravovat/ATN
ordinovat/ATN
oslazovat/ATN
ostřelit/ATN
otipnout/ATN
ovlažit/ATN
ozobat/AJTN
ošatit/ACN
oživnout/ATN
parfemovat/ATN
penzionovat/ATN
platit/ACN
plížit/AN
pochválit/ATN
podfouknout/ATN
podlítnout/AN
podrobovat/ATN
podtrhnout/ACN
podřídit/ACN
pohostit/ACN
poklepat/AJTN
pokrátit/ACN
poležet/AN
pomnožit/ATN
poněmčovat/ATN
poplenit/ATN
porakouštit/ATN
poskočit/AN
postruhovat/ATN
potetovat/ATN
poutrácet/AJTN
povytrácet/AJN
poznačit/ATN
poškrábat/AJTN
predikovat/ATN
probušit/ATN
produkovat/ATN
prohlídnout/ATXN
prokabelovat/ATN
prokořenit/ATN
prolisovat/ATN
promočit/ATN
propisovat/ATN
prorapovat/AN
prosmýčit/ATN
prosvětlovat/ATN
protéct/AN
provzdušňovat/ATN
prořítit/AN
prudit/ACN
přebarvovat/ATN
předkonfigurovat/ATN
předstrčit/ATN
přefázovat/ATN
překompilovat/ATN
přelepovat/ATN
přeorganizovat/ATN
přerodit/AN
přesušit/ATN
převelet/ATN
přeřetízkovat/ATN
přicpat/ATN
přikropit/ATN
přiobléct/ATN
přiseknout/ATN
přitvrdit/ACN
přiřadit/ACTN
razítkovat/ATN
renderovat/ATN
rokovat/ATN
rozdrápnout/ATN
rozhorlit/ATN
rozkrájet/AJTN
rozmočit/ATN
rozplynout/ATN
rozslzet/AJN
rozvažovat/ATN
rozčutnout/ATN
rukovat/AN
schvátit/ACN
sestehovat/ATN
sešvindlovat/ATN
sklidit/ACN
slibovat/ATN
smáčknout/ATN
spiralizovat/ATN
spořit/ATN
stohovat/ATN
subskribovat/ATN
syknout/ATN
tesat/AJTN
trepanovat/ATN
třesknout/ATN
udobřovat/ATN
ukončit/ATN
umixovat/ATN
uplácet/AJTN
uskladňovat/ATN
usídlovat/ATN
uvolit/ATN
uškudlit/AN
venčit/ATN
vlhnout/ATN
vplížit/AN
vtáhnout/ACN
vycementovat/ATN
vydrátkovat/ATN
vyholit/ATN
vyklepat/AJTN
vykrást/ATN
vyluštit/ATN
vynahrazovat/ATN
vypodložit/ATN
vypřáhnout/ACN
vysmolit/ATN
vysunout/ATN
vytunelovat/ATN
vyvyfénovat/ATN
vyčiňovat/ATN
vyštipovat/ATN
vzpřičovat/ATN
zaarmovat/ATN
zabzučet/ATN
zadrmolit/ATN
zahlásit/ACN
zajizvovat/ATN
zakrojit/ATN
zalepit/ATN
zamračit/ATN
zaperlit/AN
zapísknout/AN
zaskřípat/AJN
zasvítit/ACN
zatáhnout/ACN
zavzdušnit/ATN
zařaďovat/ATN
zašupovat/ATN
zcelit/ATN
zdrogovat/ATN
zestátňovat/ATN
zhojit/ATN
zjasňovat/ATN
zkonsultovat/ATN
zkřivovat/ATN
zmizet/AN
znehodnocovat/ATN
znečitelnit/ATN
zohavovat/ATN
zpohlavkovat/ATN
zpychnout/AN
zreálnit/ATN
ztéct/ATN
zvábit/ATN
zčtyřnásobit/ATN
čutnout/ATN
škobrtnout/AN
štočkovat/ATN
žrát/AT
